DIAGNOSTICS -

ENGINE

DI-85

DIC27-02

DTC P0133 | Oxygen Sensor Circuit Slow Response
(Bank 1 Sensor 1)
DTC P0153 | Oxygen Sensor Circuit Slow Response
(Bank 2 Sensor 1)
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI-35.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Voltage of Heated Oxygen Sensor (HO2S) sensor
switch between Lean and Rich for 0.9 seconds

1 doesnot|

¢ Openorshortinfrontheated oxygen sensor circuit
* Frontheated oxygen sensor
Frentheated oxygen sensor heater

P0133 ) i i *EFlorECDrelay
P0153 (2 trip detection logic) Alrinducti :
Lean: 0.4 V or less Irinduction system
Rich: 0.55 V or more * Fuelpressure
e Injector
* Engine control ECU
HINT:

. Bank 1 refersto bankthatincludes cylinder No.

1.

. Bank 2refersto bankthatdoes notincludes cylinder No.
e  Sensor 1 referstothe sensor closertothe engine assembly.

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)



DI-86
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

MONITOR DESCRIPTION

Slow slope condition
A

Lean to Rich time Rich to Lean time

055 — — — \= — — —

040 — — — — —

Oxygen sensor output voltage (V)

Y

Y Lean to Rich / Rich to Lean time definition Time A20599

The engine control ECU uses the heated oxygen sensorinformation to regulate the air —fuelratiocloseto
a stoichiometric ratio. This maximizes the catalytic converter’s ability to purify the exhaust gases. The sensor
detects oxygen levels in the exhaust gas and sends this signal to the engine control ECU.

The inner surface of the sensor element is exposed to outside air. The outer surface of the sensor element
is exposed to exhaust gas. The sensor element is made of platinum coated zirconia and includes an inte-
grated heating element. The heated oxygen sensor has the characteristic whereby its output voltage
changes suddenly inthe vicinity of the stoichiometric air —fuelratio. The heated oxygen sensor generates
waveforms of avoltage between0V and 1 Vinresponsetothe oxygen concentrationin exhaust gas. When
the output voltage of the heated oxygen sensor is 0.55 V or more, the engine control ECU judges that the
air—-fuelratiois RICH. Whenitis 0.40V or less, the engine control ECU judges thatthe air -

The engine control ECU monitors the response feature of the heated oxygen sensor. Ifthe response time
H%@Qé?Mgen sensor output status change from RICHto LEAN or vice versabecomeslonger, the
engine control ECU interprets this as a malfunction in the heated oxygen sensor and sets a DTC.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI-35.

CONFIRMATION DRIVING PATTERN

25 sec. ormore 25sec.ormore  25sec. or more

40 km/h 25 mph) | — — — — — -\ - — — 4\ — — — =\ - - —

Idling Idling Idling Idling
IG SW OFF
Engine is warming-up  30sec.ormore  30sec. ormore 30 sec.
(2 minutes or more) A22010

(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.

(b)  Switch from normal mode to check mode (see page DI-3).

(c) Allowthe enginetoidle untilthe Engine Coolant Temperature (ECT) reaches 75 C (167[F).

(d)  Allow the vehicle to run at 40 km/h (25 mph) or more for 25 seconds or more.

(e) Allow the engine to idle for 30 seconds or more. Perform steps (d) and (e) at least 3 times.

()  Allow the engine to idle for 30 seconds.

HINT:

Ifamalfunction exists, the check engine warning light will be illuminated on the multi -information display
during step (f).

NOTICE:

If the conditions in this test are not strictly followed, you should perform steps (d) and (e).

If you do not have the Intelligent Tester Il, turn the ignition switch OFF after performing steps from
(c) to (f), then perform steps from (c) to (f) again.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Hand-heldtesteronly:
The narrowing down the trouble area is possible by performing ACTIVE TEST of the following "A/F CON-
TROL” (Heated oxygen sensor or another can be distinguished).
(a) Perform ACTIVETESTbyhand  -heldtester (A/F CONTROL).
HINT:
"A/F CONTROL”isthe ACTIVE TEST which changes the injection volume to -12.5% or +25%.
(1) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLC3onthevehicle.
(2)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Warm up the engine with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.
(4) Select the item "DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / ACTIVE TEST / A/lF CONTROL”.
(5) Perform "A/F CONTROL” with the engine in an idle condition (press the right or left button).
RESULT:
Heated oxygen sensor reacts in accordance with increase and decrease of injection volume
+25% — richoutput: Morethan0.5V
-12.5% — leanoutput: Lessthan0.4V
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NOTICE:

However,thereis afew seconddelayinthe sensor

20 seconds delay in the sensor 2 (rear sensor).

1 (front sensor) output. And there isa maximum

Outputvoltage of heated oxygen
sensor (sensor 1:frontsensor)

Outputvoltage of heated oxygen
Sensor (sensor 2: rear sensor)

Mainly suspect
trouble area

Case 1

Injection volume
+25 % * _____
-125%
Outputvoltage

More than 0.55 V
Less than 0.4 V

OK

Injection volume
+25 % * _____
-12.5%

Output voltage

More than 0.5 V
Lessthan0.4V

Case?2

Injection volume

+25 % * _____
-12.5%

Outputvoltage

Almost no reaction

NG

Injection volume

+25 % * _____
-12.5%

Output voltage

More than 0.5V
Less than 0.4 V

/S Sk

Sensor 1:frontsensor
(sensor 1, heater, sensor 1
circuit)

Case3

Injection volume

+25 % * _____
-12.5%

Outputvoltage
More than 0.55 V

Injection volume

+25 % * _____
-12.5%

Output voltage

Sensor 2: rear sensor
(sensor 2, heater, sensor 2
circuit)

Less than 0.4 V OK | Almostnoreaction NG
Injection volume Injection volume .
1959 * +95 % * Extremely rich or lean of the
1259 VT — L7 1259 T — L7~ actualair —fuelratio
Case4 | Outputvoltage Output voltage (Injector, fuel pressure, gas
leakage in exhaust system,
Almost no reaction NG | Aimostnoreaction NG| etc)

The following A/F CONTROL procedure enables the technician to check and graph the voltage output of
the heated oxygen sensors (sensor
For displaying the graph indication, enter ’ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL / USER DATA” then select "02S

1and2).

B1S1 andO2SB 1S2”by pressing”YES” button and push”’ENTER” button before pressing "F4” button.
NOTICE:

Ifthe vehicleis shortof fuel, the air

recorded, and the MIL then comes on.

—fuelratiobecomes LEANand DTCs PO

133and/orP0 153 willbe

. Readfreezeframedatausingthehand  -heldtester. Freeze frame datarecordsthe engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air —fuel ratiowasleanorrich, etc. at
the time of the malfunction.

« Ahighheated oxygensensor (sensor 1) voltage (0.55V ormore) could be caused by arich airfuel
mixture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run rich.

+ Alowheated oxygensensor (sensor 1) voltage (0.4V orless) could be caused by alean airfuel mix-
ture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run lean.
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1 | Are there any other codes (besides DTC P0133 or P0153) being output?

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand—held tester to the DLC3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

(c) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DTC INFO /

CURRENT CODES.

CHECK:

Read the DTC using the hand—held tester.

RESULT:
Display (DTC Output) Proceed to
"P0133 and/or P0153" A

"P0133 or P0153” and other DTCs B
HINT:

If any other codes besides "P0133 and/or P0153” are output, perform the troubleshooting for those DTCs
first.

B > Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI-19).
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2 | Check output voltage of heated oxygen sensor during idling.

PREPARATION:

(@) Warm up the heated oxygen sensor with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.

(b) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.

(c) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menu: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL
/ O2S B1 S1 or B2 S1.

CHECK:

Check the output voltage of the heated oxygen sensor while idling the hand-held tester.

OK:
Heated oxygen sensor output voltage:
Alternates between less than 0.40 V and more than 0.55V, and period of ”t” must exist less than
0.9 seconds (See the following table).

OK NG NG NG

055V —|-— /\/\ 777777777 /\/\

040V —F—|-—t+%ft—-|-—————-- ot W R P e

()__

-

A20315

Go to step 9.
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3 [ Check resistance of heated oxygen sensor heater.

Components Side:
Boo|n M
\ /

@ 2]

(13 413
El @OX

Bankl Sensorl, Bank2 Sensorl

YA
&

2

1
3

4
El/

S,

c Bank1 Sensor2, Bank2 Sensor2

A20870

OK

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen sensor

connector.
CHECK:

Measure resistance between terminals of the heated oxygen

sensor.
OK:

Tester Connection

Specified Condition

HT (H11-1) - +B (H11-2)

11.7 to 14.3 Q (20°C)

HT (H12-1) - +B (H12-2)

11.7 to 14.3 Q (20°C)

HT (H13-1) - +B (H13-2)

11.7 to 14.3 Q (20°C)

HT (H14-1) - +B (H14-2)

11.7 to 14.3 Q (20°C)

)

Replace heated oxygen sensor.

4 | Check EFI or ECD relay.

EFIl or ECD Relay

1 3 2|4
g1
) . 1]3]

A21543
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PREPARATION:

Remove the EFI or ECD relay from the engine room R/B.

CHECK:

Inspect the EFI or ECD relay.

OK:

Terminal No. Condition Specified Condition
Usually 10 k< or higher
1-3 Apply B+ between Below 1 9
terminals 2 and 4

)

Replace EFI or ECD relay.
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5 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and heated oxygen sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen

B HT
/[LD_[W\ sensor connector.
/’a

(b) Disconnect the E8 engine control ECU connector.

@ 21 CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-

tors.
/ \ OK:

Components Side:

Bankl Sensorl, Bank2 Sensorl Tester Connection Specified Condition
OX (H11-3) - OX1A (E8-23) Below 1 Q
+B J—]_D_I—L HT HT (H11-1) - HT1A (E8-4) Below 1 Q
\//1——%/ OX (H12-3) - OX1B (E8-29) Below 1 Q
@ 2 1 HT (H12-1) - HT1B (E8-5) Below 1 Q
OX (H13-3) - OX2A (E8-22) Below 1 Q
ii HT (H13-1) - HT2A (E8-33) Below 1 Q
@ OX (H14-3) - OX2B (E8-21) Below 1 Q
El \L/_\_F/ OX HT (H14-1) - HT2B (E8-25) Below 1 Q
c Bank1 Sensor2, Bank2 Sensor2 ,, ... OX (H11-3) or OX1A (E8-23) -

10 k< or higher

Body ground

HT (H11-1) or HT1A (E8-4) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

OX (H12-3) or OX1B (E8-29) -
Body ground
HT (H12-1) or HT1B (E8-5) —
Body ground

10 k< or higher

10 k< or higher

OX (H13-3) or OX2A (E8-22) -

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

p atsz2 Engine Control ECU CONNEctor yeeso HT (H13-1) or HT2A (E8-33) - 10 k€2 or higher
Body ground

OX (H14-3) or OX2B (E8-21) -
Body ground

HT (H14-1) or HT2B (E8-25) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

10 k< or higher
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Reference (Bank 1 Sensor 1 System Drawing)
Heater Oxygen

EFl or ECD _
Relay EFl or ECD ~ensor Engine Control ECU
No. 2 Fuse HT1A
From OO OO
Battery EFl or ECD
No. 1 Fuse OX1A
1
[ —
E2
MREL

A22009

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

6 | Check air induction system (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-1).

CHECK:
Check the air induction system for vacuum leaks.

NG> Repair or replace air induction system.

OK
~_—

7 | Check fuel pressure (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-1).

CHECK:
Check the fuel pressure (high or low pressure).

page FI-7).

NG Check and repair fuel pump, pressure regulator,
fuel pipe line and filter (See Pub. No. RM630E,
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8 [ Check injector injection (See Pub. No. RM630E, page Fl-24).

NG> Replace injector.

@

Replace heated oxygen sensor.

9 [ Perform confirmation driving pattern.

HINT:
Clear all DTCs prior to performing the confirmation driving pattern.

3

10 |lIsthere DTC P0133 or P0153 being output again?

(See page DI-3).

NO> Check for intermittent problems

YES

Replace heated oxygen sensor.

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)



